Utah statutes.
63I-4a-302.   Board to create inventory.

At least every two years, the board shall compile and make available to the public, by electronic means, an updated inventory of activities of the agencies in the state to classify whether each activity is:

(1)  a commercial activity; or

(2)  an inherently governmental activity.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 325, 2013 General Session

